trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="ata/car__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>care</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>care</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>careis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>caren</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cares</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>case</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>case</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>caseis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>casen</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cases</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cáremos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cásemos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__canta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caba</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caba</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cabais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caban</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cabas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cad</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cad</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cada</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cadas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cado</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cados</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>camos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>camos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>can</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cando</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>car</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>car</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cara</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cara</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>carais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caran</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caras</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caremos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caron</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cará</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>carán</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>carás</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caré</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caréis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caría</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caría</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caríais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caríamos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>carían</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>carías</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>caste</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>casteis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>co</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cá</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantá" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cábamos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cád</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cáis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cándo</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>cár</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>

      <e lm="achacar"><i>acha</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="afincar"><i>afin</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="ahorcar"><i>ahor</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="aparcar"><i>apar</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="arrancar"><i>arran</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="atacar"><i>ata</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="atascar"><i>atas</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="becar"><i>be</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="buscar"><i>bus</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="clasificar"><i>clasifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="complicar"><i>compli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="convocar"><i>convo</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="desembarcar"><i>desembar</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="destacar"><i>desta</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="duplicar"><i>dupli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="enmarcar"><i>enmar</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="explicar"><i>expli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="gratificar"><i>gratifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="identificar"><i>identifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="justificar"><i>justifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="marcar"><i>mar</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="masticar"><i>masti</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="multiplicar"><i>multipli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="picar"><i>pi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="predicar"><i>predi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="publicar"><i>publi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="rectificar"><i>rectifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sacar"><i>sa</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="secar"><i>se</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="surcar"><i>sur</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="trocar"><i>tro</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="verificar"><i>verifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="certificar" a="webform"><i>certifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="implicar" a="webform"><i>impli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="reivindicar" a="webform"><i>reivindi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="calificar" a="webform"><i>califi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="rascar los bolsillos" a="webform"><i>ras</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/><p><l><b/>los<b/>bolsillos</l><r><g><b/>los<b/>bolsillos</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="tocar madera" a="webform"><i>to</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/><p><l><b/>madera</l><r><g><b/>madera</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="salpicar" a="webform"><i>salpi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="multiplicar" a="eleka"><p><l>multipli</l><r>multipli</r></p><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="dedicar" a="eleka"><i>dedi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="recalcar" a="eleka"><i>recal</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="abdicar" a="eleka"><i>abdi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="abroncar" a="eleka"><i>abron</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="adjudicar" a="eleka"><i>adjudi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="colocar" a="eleka"><p><l>colo</l><r>colo</r></p><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="erradicar" a="eleka"><i>erradi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="cuantificar" a="eleka"><p><l>cuantifi</l><r>cuantifi</r></p><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sacar dinero" a="eleka"><i>sa</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/><p><l><b/>dinero</l><r><g><b/>dinero</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="caducar" a="eleka"><i>cadu</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="bonificar" a="eleka"><i>bonifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="planificar" a="eleka"><i>planifi</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="triplicar" a="eleka"><i>tripli</i><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sonsacar" a="eleka"><p><l>sonsa</l><r>sonsa</r></p><par n="ata/car__vblex"/></e>
